North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 2. Withdrawal.

§ 57D-7-20.
Withdrawal of foreign LLC.

A foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this State may not withdraw from this State until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

A foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this State may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must state the following:

The name of the foreign LLC and if different the name provided in the foreign LLC’s certificate of authority that the foreign LLC is authorized to use to transact business in this State.

The name of the jurisdiction under whose law it is organized.

That the foreign LLC is not transacting business in this State and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this State.

That the foreign LLC revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service of process and consents to service of process in any proceeding based on any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of business transacted in this State, during the time the foreign LLC was authorized to transact business in this State, being made on such foreign LLC by service thereof on the Secretary of State.

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under subdivision (4) of this subsection.

A commitment to deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

If the Secretary of State finds that the application conforms to law, the Secretary of State shall do the following:

File the application for the certificate of withdrawal as provided in

G.S. 55D-15

.

Issue a certificate of withdrawal to which the Secretary of State shall affix the exact or conformed copy of the application.

Send to the foreign LLC or its representative the certificate of withdrawal together with the exact or conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign LLC is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (b) of this section may be made by delivering to the Secretary of State, or to any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of that process and the fee required by G.S. 57D-1-22(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the foreign LLC at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-21.
Withdrawal of foreign LLC by reason of a merger, consolidation, or conversion; qualification of successor.

Whenever a foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this State ceases its separate existence as a result of a statutory merger, consolidation, or other reorganization permitted by the law of the jurisdiction under which it is organized, or converts into another type of entity as permitted by that law, the surviving or resulting entity shall apply for a certificate of withdrawal for the foreign LLC by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the articles of merger, consolidation, or other reorganization or conversion or a certificate reciting the facts of the merger, consolidation, or other reorganization or conversion, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the jurisdiction under the law of which the foreign LLC was organized. If the surviving or resulting entity is not authorized to transact business in this State, the application for the certificate of withdrawal must state, and therefore modify the information described below that otherwise is required to be provided under G.S. 57D-7-20(b) to the extent of conflict, the following:

The name of the foreign LLC and, if different, the name provided in the foreign LLC’s certificate of authority that the foreign LLC is authorized to use to transact business in this State.

The name of the jurisdiction under whose law it is organized.

The type of entity and name of the surviving or resulting entity.

That the surviving or resulting entity is not transacting business in this State and the foreign LLC surrenders its authority to transact business in this State.

That the surviving or resulting entity revokes the authority of the foreign LLC’s registered agent to accept service of process and consents to service of process in any proceeding based on any cause of action arising in this State, or arising out of business transacted in this State, during the time the foreign LLC was authorized to transact business in this State, being made on the surviving or resulting entity by service thereof on the Secretary of State.

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on the Secretary of State under subdivision (5) of this subsection.

A commitment to deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of any subsequent change in the surviving or resulting entity’s mailing address.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles or certificate described in subsection (a) of this section relating to the merger, consolidation, or other reorganization or conversion and the application for the certificate of withdrawal conform to law, the Secretary of State shall do the following:

File the articles or certificate and the application for the certificate of withdrawal as provided in

G.S. 55D-15

.

Issue a certificate of withdrawal.

Send to the surviving or resulting entity or its representative the certificate of withdrawal, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application, if required, affixed thereto.

After the withdrawal of the foreign LLC is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State in accordance with subsection (a) of this section is to be made by delivering to the Secretary of State or to any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process duplicate copies of process and the fee required by G.S. 57D-1-22(b). Upon receipt of process in the manner provided in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the surviving or resulting entity at the mailing address designated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-22.
Authority of Attorney General.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to restrain a foreign LLC from transacting business in this State in violation of this Article.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-7-23 through 57D-7-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.